Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
PART 2 Political Party and Nonpartisan Primaries

21-2-150.
Date of general primary.

Whenever any political party holds a primary to nominate candidates for public offices to be filled in the ensuing November election, such primary shall be held on the Tuesday of the twenty-fourth week prior to the November general election in each even-numbered year or, in the case of municipalities, on the third Tuesday in July in each odd-numbered year.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 244, § 8; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 335, § 2; Ga. L. 1961, p. 432, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 15, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-801, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 602, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1256, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1190, § 8; Ga. L. 1984, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 643, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 101, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 11; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 269, § 11; Ga. L. 2001, Ex. Sess., p. 325, § 6; Ga. L. 2011, p. 535, § 1/HB 302; Ga. L. 2014, p. 1, § 2/HB 310.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1190, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that it was the intent of that Act to implement the provisions of Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VI, Sec. VII, Para. I.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment of this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 96 (2001).

For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 93 (2014).

21-2-151.
Conduct of political party primaries.

A political party shall nominate its candidates for public office in a primary. Except for substitute nominations as provided in Code Section 21-2-134 and nomination of presidential electors, all nominees of a political party for public office shall be nominated in the primary preceding the general election in which the candidates’ names will be listed on the ballot.

The primary held for such purposes shall be conducted by the superintendent in the same manner as prescribed by law and by rules and regulations of the State Election Board and the superintendent for general elections. Primaries of all political parties shall be conducted jointly.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1005, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1004, enacted by Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 13; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1190, § 9; Ga. L. 1984, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 269, § 12; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 19/HB 244; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 8/SB 92.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1190, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that it was the intent of that Act to implement the provisions of Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VI, Sec. VII, Para. I.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment of this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 96 (2001).

21-2-152.
Conduct of primaries generally; run-off primary.

Primaries shall be held and conducted in all respects in accordance with this chapter relating to general elections and the provisions of this chapter relating to general elections shall apply thereto, insofar as practicable and not inconsistent with any other provisions of this chapter. All such primaries shall be conducted in each precinct by the poll officers, by the use of the same equipment and facilities, so far as practicable, as are used for such general elections.

A political party, in nominating a candidate for public office in a municipal primary, may also nominate persons to serve as poll officers for such primaries, and the superintendent shall consider such nominations but shall have discretion to appoint poll officers for each polling place in each precinct.

A run-off primary shall be a continuation of the primary and only persons who were entitled to vote in the primary shall be entitled to vote therein; and only those votes cast for the persons designated for the runoff shall be counted in the tabulation and canvass of the votes cast. Any elector who votes in the primary of one party shall not be eligible to vote in a primary runoff of any other party other than a primary runoff of the party in whose primary such elector voted.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1005, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1008, enacted by Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 13; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 683, § 3/SB 82.

21-2-153.
Qualification of candidates for party nomination in a state or county primary; posting of list of all qualified candidates; filing of affidavit with political party by each qualifying candidate; performance of military service does not create vacancy.

A candidate for any party nomination in a state or county primary may qualify by either of the two following methods:

Payment of a qualifying fee pursuant to Code Section 21-2-131; or

The submission of a pauper’s affidavit by any candidate who has filed a qualifying petition as provided for in subsection (a.1) of this Code section, by which the candidate under oath affirms his or her poverty and his or her resulting inability to pay the qualifying fee otherwise required. The form of the affidavit shall be prescribed by the Secretary of State and shall include a financial statement which lists the total income, assets, liabilities, and other relevant financial information of the candidate and shall indicate on its face that the candidate has neither the assets nor the income to pay the qualifying fee otherwise required. The affidavit shall contain an oath that such candidate has neither the assets nor the income to pay the qualifying fee otherwise required. The following warning shall be printed on the affidavit form prepared by the Secretary of State, to wit: “WARNING: Any person knowingly making any false statement on this affidavit commits the offense of false swearing and shall be guilty of a felony.” The name of any candidate who subscribes and swears to an oath that such candidate has neither the assets nor the income to pay the qualifying fee otherwise required shall be placed on the ballot by the Secretary of State or election superintendent, as the case may be.

If a candidate seeks to qualify for a county or militia district office, the pauper’s affidavit and financial statement shall be presented to the county political party; otherwise, the candidate shall file his or her pauper’s affidavit and financial statement with the state political party.

A qualifying petition of a candidate seeking an office which is voted upon state wide shall be signed by a number of voters equal to one-fourth of 1 percent of the total number of registered voters eligible to vote in the last election for the filling of the office the candidate is seeking and the signers of such petition shall be registered and eligible to vote in the election at which such candidate seeks to be elected. A qualifying petition of a candidate for any other office shall be signed by a number of voters equal to 1 percent of the total number of registered voters eligible to vote in the last election for the filling of the office the candidate is seeking and the signers of such petition shall be registered and eligible to vote in the election at which such candidate seeks to be elected. However, in the case of a candidate seeking an office for which there has never been an election or seeking an office in a newly constituted constituency, the percentage figure shall be computed on the total number of registered voters in the constituency who would have been qualified to vote for such office had the election been held at the last general election and the signers of such petition shall be registered and eligible to vote in the election at which such candidate seeks to be elected;

Each person signing a qualifying petition shall declare therein that he or she is a duly qualified and registered elector of the state entitled to vote in the next election for the filling of the office sought by the candidate supported by the petition and shall add to his or her signature his or her residence address, giving municipality, if any, and county, with street and number, if any. No person shall sign the same petition more than once. Each petition shall support the candidacy of only a single candidate. A signature shall be stricken from the petition when the signer so requests prior to the presentation of the petition to the appropriate officer for filing, but such a request shall be disregarded if made after such presentation. Each sheet shall bear on the bottom or back thereof the affidavit of the circulator of such sheet, setting forth:

That each signature on such sheet was signed within 180 days of the last day on which such petition may be filed; and

That, to the best of the affiant’s knowledge and belief, the signers are registered electors of this state qualified to sign the petition, that their respective residences are correctly stated in the petition, and that they all reside in the county named in the affidavit;

A qualifying petition shall be in the form and manner determined by the Secretary of State and approved by the State Elections Board;

No qualifying petition shall be circulated prior to 180 days before the last day on which such petition may be filed, and no signature shall be counted unless it was signed within 180 days of the last day for filing the same; and

A qualifying petition shall not be amended or supplemented after its presentation to the appropriate officer for filing.

(a.1)

No candidate shall be authorized to file a pauper’s affidavit in lieu of paying the qualifying fee otherwise required by this Code section and Code Section 21-2-131 unless such candidate has filed a qualifying petition which complies with the following requirements:

Unless otherwise provided by law, all candidates for party nomination in a state or county primary shall qualify as such candidates in accordance with the procedural rules of their party; provided, however, that no person shall be prohibited from qualifying for such office if he or she:

Meets the requirements of such procedural rules;

Is eligible to hold the office which he or she seeks;

Is not prohibited from being nominated or elected by provisions of Code Section 21-2-7 or 21-2-8; and

If party rules so require, affirms his or her allegiance to his or her party by signing the following oath:

“I do hereby swear or affirm my allegiance to the (name of party) Party.”

In the case of a general state or county primary, the candidates or their agents shall commence qualifying at 9:00 A.M. on the Monday of the eleventh week immediately prior to the state or county primary and shall cease qualifying at 12:00 Noon on the Friday immediately following such Monday, notwithstanding the fact that any such days may be legal holidays. All qualifying for federal and state offices shall be conducted in the state capitol.

Reserved.

In the case of a special primary for a federal office, the candidate shall qualify no earlier than the date of the call for the special primary and no later than 60 days immediately prior to the date of such special primary, and such qualifying period shall be open for a minimum of two and one-half days. In the case of a special primary for any other office, the candidate shall qualify no earlier than the date of the call for the special primary and no later than 25 days immediately prior to the date of such special primary, and such qualifying period shall be open for a minimum of two and one-half days.

In any case where an incumbent has qualified as a candidate to succeed himself or herself in office but withdraws as a candidate for such office prior to the close of the applicable qualifying period prescribed in this paragraph, qualifying for candidates other than such incumbent shall be reopened at 9:00 A.M. on the Monday next following the close of the preceding qualifying period and shall cease at 5:00 P.M. on the Tuesday immediately following such reopening, notwithstanding the fact that any such days may be legal holidays.

If a political party has not designated at least 14 days immediately prior to the beginning of qualifying a party official in a county with whom the candidates of such party for county elective offices shall qualify, the election superintendent of the county shall qualify candidates on behalf of such party. The election superintendent shall give notice in the legal organ of the county at least three days before the beginning of qualifying giving the dates, times, and location for qualifying candidates on behalf of such political party.

Within two hours after the qualifications have ceased, the county executive committee of each political party shall post at the office of the county election superintendent a list of all candidates who have qualified with such executive committee, and the state executive committee of each political party shall provide a list of all candidates who have qualified with such committee to the office of the Secretary of State. If the election superintendent qualifies the candidates for a political party in accordance with subsection (c) of this Code section, the election superintendent shall post at his or her office a list of all the candidates who have qualified with such superintendent for such political party.

Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 21-2-154, it shall be unlawful for any person to add or remove any candidates from either of the lists provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection following the posting of such lists unless such candidates have died, withdrawn, or been disqualified. Any person who violates this paragraph shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Each candidate for party nomination described in subsection (a) of this Code section shall file an affidavit with the political party at the time of his or her qualifying stating:

His or her full name and the name as the candidate desires it to be listed on the ballot. The surname of the candidate shall be the surname of the candidate as it appears on the candidate’s voter registration card. After such name is certified by the political party to the Secretary of State or the election superintendent, the form of such name shall not be changed during the primary and election for which such affidavit is submitted;

His or her residence, with street and number, if any, and his or her post office address;

His or her profession, business, or occupation, if any;

The name of his or her precinct;

That he or she is an elector of the county of his or her residence eligible to vote in the primary election in which he or she is a candidate for nomination;

The name of the office he or she is seeking;

That he or she is eligible to hold such office;

That the candidate has never been convicted and sentenced in any court of competent jurisdiction for fraudulent violation of primary or election laws, malfeasance in office, or felony involving moral turpitude under the laws of this state or any other state or of the United States, or that the candidate’s civil rights have been restored and that at least ten years have elapsed from the date of the completion of the sentence without a subsequent conviction of another felony involving moral turpitude;

That he or she will not knowingly violate this chapter or rules or regulations adopted under this chapter; and

Any other information as may be determined by the Secretary of State to be necessary to comply with federal and state law.

Candidates for the office of presidential elector or their agents who have been nominated in accordance with the rules of a political party shall qualify beginning at 9:00 A.M. on the Monday of the thirty-fifth week prior to the November general election in the year in which a presidential election shall be held and shall cease qualifying at 12:00 Noon on the Friday immediately following such Monday, notwithstanding the fact that any such days may be legal holidays. All qualifying for the office of presidential elector shall be conducted in the state capitol.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any elected public officer who is performing ordered military duty, as defined in Code Section 38-2-279, shall be eligible for reelection in any primary or general election which may be held to elect a successor for the next term of office, and may qualify in absentia as a candidate for reelection to such office. The performance of ordered military duty shall not create a vacancy in such office during the term for which such public officer was elected.

Where the giving of written notice of candidacy is required, any elected public officer who is performing ordered military duty may deliver such notice by mail, agent, or messenger to the proper elections official. Any other act required by law of a candidate may, during the time such officer is on ordered military duty, be performed by an agent designated in writing by the absent public officer.

(A)

His or her residence address, giving municipality with street and number, if any;

(B)

That each signer manually signed his or her own name with full knowledge of the contents of the qualifying petition;

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1006, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 501, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 329, § 11; Code 1933, § 34-1005, enacted by Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 13; Ga. L. 1974, p. 4, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 575, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 205, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1053, § 4; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1004, § 18; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 21; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 930, § 4; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1038, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 206, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 496, § 5; Ga. L. 1986, p. 32, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 647, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1360, § 8; Ga. L. 1989, p. 643, § 5; Ga. L. 1989, p. 903, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 243, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2510, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 118, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 617, § 5; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1406, §§ 4, 5; Ga. L. 1996, p. 145, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 12; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 9; Ga. L. 2001, Ex. Sess., p. 325, § 7; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, §§ 12-14; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 20/HB 244; Ga. L. 2009, p. 311, § 3/HB 156; Ga. L. 2011, p. 535, § 2/HB 302; Ga. L. 2011, p. 683, § 4/SB 82; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 10/SB 92; Ga. L. 2014, p. 1, § 3/HB 310.

Cross references.

Persons ineligible to hold public office, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. II, Para. III.

False swearing generally, §

16-10-71

.

Penalty for making of false statement in connection with qualifying as candidate for party nomination, §

21-2-565

.

Qualifying in absentia for magistrates serving on active duty, §

15-10-20.1

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 930, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article II, Section I, Paragraph III and Article II, Section II, Paragraph III of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 93 (2014).

For note, “Georgia’s Runoff Election System Has Run Its Course,” see 54 Ga. L. Rev. 1063 (2020).

21-2-153.1.
Qualification of candidates for party nomination in a municipal primary; unopposed candidates; filing of affidavit with political party; posting of list of all qualified candidates.

Unless otherwise provided by law, all candidates for party nomination in a municipal primary shall qualify as such candidates in accordance with the rules of their party. In the case of a general municipal primary, the candidates, or their agents, shall qualify at least 15 but not more than 45 days prior to the date of such primary, and such qualifying period shall be open for a minimum of two and one-half days. In the case of a special municipal primary, the candidates, or their agents, shall qualify at least ten but not more than 30 days prior to the date of such primary, and such qualifying period shall be open for a minimum of two and one-half days. The executive committee or other rule-making body of the party shall fix the qualifying date within the limitations provided in this Code section.

After the expiration of the applicable qualification deadline prescribed in subsection (a) of this Code section, each candidate for nomination to a municipal office, having no opposing candidates within his or her own political party, shall automatically become the nominee of his or her party for such office if the applicable city charter or ordinance does not provide to the contrary. The name of such an unopposed candidate and the title of the nomination he or she is seeking shall not be placed upon the primary ballots or ballot labels. The proper officials of his or her political party shall certify the candidate as the party nominee for the office involved for the purpose of having his or her name placed upon the election ballots or ballot labels. In applying Code Sections 21-2-131 through 21-2-134, such an unopposed municipal candidate shall be deemed to have been nominated in a primary held by his or her political party.

No person shall qualify with any political party as a candidate for nomination to any municipal office when such person has qualified for the same primary with another political party as a candidate for nomination by that party for any municipal office; nor shall a municipal or other appropriate executive committee of a political party certify any person as the candidate of said party when such person has previously qualified as a candidate for nomination for any public office for the same primary with another political party.

Each candidate for party nomination described in subsection (a) of this Code section shall file an affidavit with the political party at the time of his or her qualifying stating:

His or her full name and the name as the candidate desires it to be listed on the ballot. The surname of the candidate shall be the surname of the candidate as it appears on the candidate’s voter registration card. After such name is submitted by the candidate to the political party, the form of such name shall not be changed during the primary and election for which such affidavit is submitted;

His or her residence, with street and number, if any, and his or her post office address;

His or her profession, business, or occupation, if any;

The name of his or her precinct;

That he or she is an elector of the municipality of his or her residence and is eligible to vote in the primary election in which he or she is a candidate for nomination;

The name of the office he or she is seeking;

That he or she is eligible to hold such office;

That he or she has never been convicted and sentenced in any court of competent jurisdiction for fraudulent violation of primary or election laws, malfeasance in office, or felony involving moral turpitude under the laws of this state or any other state or of the United States, or that his or her civil rights have been restored; and

That he or she will not knowingly violate this chapter or any rules and regulations adopted under this chapter.

Within two hours after the qualifications have ceased, the municipal executive committee of each political party shall post a list of all candidates who have qualified with such committee at city hall.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-153.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 10; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 21/HB 244.

Cross references.

Persons ineligible to hold public office, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. II, Para. III.

21-2-154.
Certification of political party candidates.

At or before 12:00 Noon on the third day after the deadline for qualifying, the county executive committee of each political party shall certify to the superintendent and the state executive committee of each political party shall certify to the Secretary of State, on forms prescribed by the Secretary of State, all those candidates who have qualified with such committee for the succeeding primary election. Such certification shall be accompanied by the appropriate amount of the qualifying fees paid by such candidates as prescribed in paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection (c) of Code Section 21-2-131 and a copy of the declaration of candidacy and affidavit of each such candidate. Such certification shall not be accepted if the political party has not registered with the Secretary of State as required in Article 3 of this chapter. When the election superintendent qualifies candidates on behalf of a political party pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 21-2-153, the election superintendent shall certify at or before 12:00 Noon on the third day after the deadline for qualifying, on forms provided by the Secretary of State, all those candidates of such political party who qualified with the election superintendent.

Any candidate whose name does not appear on the list of candidates posted by a county executive committee or the state executive committee pursuant to subsection (d) of Code Section 21-2-153 shall not be certified under this Code section; provided, however, that the name of a candidate who has properly qualified whose name has been left off of the list of candidates through inadvertence or clerical error may be placed upon such list upon the filing of an affidavit by the county executive committee or the state executive committee, as appropriate, attesting to such inadvertence or error. The county executive committee of each political party shall attach to its certification a copy of the affidavits required by paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 15-6-50, paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 15-9-2, subparagraph (c)(2)(A) of Code Section 15-16-1, paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 45-16-1, and paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 48-5-210.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1006, enacted by Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 13; Ga. L. 1985, p. 496, § 6; Ga. L. 1989, p. 643, § 6; Ga. L. 1989, p. 903, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1091, § 5; Ga. L. 1990, p. 243, § 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 96, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 13; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 11.

21-2-155.
Reopening of qualification for office in event of candidate’s death or withdrawal of incumbent who qualified as candidate prior to political party primary.

In the event of the death of a candidate or the withdrawal of an incumbent who qualified as a candidate to succeed himself or herself in office, either of which occurs after the close of qualifying for candidates for such office but prior to the date of a political party primary, the state executive committee or other committee of the party authorized by party rule or, in the case of a municipal election, the municipal executive committee may reopen qualification for the office sought by the deceased or withdrawn candidate for a period of not less than one nor more than three days.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1007, enacted by Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 13; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1190, § 10; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1430, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 269, § 13; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 11/SB 92.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1190, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that it was the intent of that Act to implement the provisions of Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VI, Sec. VII, Para. I.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment of this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 96 (2001).

21-2-156.
Payment of primary expenses.

The expenses of a primary shall be paid by the respective county, except that the expenses of municipal primaries shall be governed by subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section, and forms listed under paragraph (5) of Code Section 21-2-50 shall be furnished upon request by the Secretary of State.

The expenses of a municipal primary shall be borne by the political party holding such primary except as provided in this subsection and subsection (c) of this Code section, and except that the expenses of providing polling places on public premises and electors lists shall be paid by the respective municipalities.

The governing authority of each municipality may in its discretion authorize the payment by the municipality of any or all primary expenses other than those required by subsection (b) of this Code section to be paid by the municipality. This authorization of payment by the municipality of other primary expenses shall extend only to the expenses of primaries conducted by political parties which meet the definition of a “political party” contained in paragraph (25) of Code Section 21-2-2. Such additional expenditures as a municipal governing authority elects to make under this subsection are declared to be for a public purpose.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1009, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 13; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-157.
Municipal nonpartisan primary; qualifying as a candidate; payment of expenses.

The governing authority of any municipality may call and hold a nonpartisan primary for the purpose of nominating candidates to seek municipal office in a subsequent election. If held, such a nonpartisan primary shall be held at least 50 but not more than 60 days prior to the date of the election for which nominations are to be made; and the call for such primary shall be publicly issued at least 60 days prior to the date of holding the primary. To the extent practicable, the provisions of this chapter which apply to the preparation for and conduct of primaries of political parties shall also apply to the preparation for and conduct of municipal nonpartisan primaries.

Each candidate for nomination to an office in a nonpartisan primary shall qualify as such candidate by personally, or by his or her duly authorized agent, filing notice of his or her candidacy in the office of the superintendent of his or her municipality at least 45 days prior to the date of the primary, in accordance with the provisions of the charter and ordinances of the municipality not inconsistent with the requirements of this chapter.

The expenses of a municipal nonpartisan primary may be paid by the municipality calling and holding such primary; provided, however, that the expenses of providing polling places on public premises and electors lists shall be paid by the municipality.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-157

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Calls for primaries and elections, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Dates of Primaries and Elections, § 183-1-8-.01.

21-2-158.
Unopposed candidate failing to receive a single vote.

In any general primary where an unopposed candidate is seeking party nomination for a public office, where such candidate’s name appears on the primary ballot but such candidate fails to receive a single vote, such candidate shall not be nominated for such public office and such party shall not have a candidate for that public office on the ballot in the ensuing general election.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-158

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, Ex. Sess., p. 325, § 4.